test/src/morphology/N-ruzuu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ruzū: # Noun 90 'eng /est rusu/fin' - full paradigm
     ruzū+N+Sg+Nom: ruzū
     ruzū+N+Sg+Gen: ruzū
     ruzū+N+Sg+Par: ruzū
     ruzū+N+Sg+Dat: ruzūn
     ruzū+N+Sg+Ins: ruzūks
     ruzū+N+Sg+Ill: [ruzūz, ruzū]
     ruzū+N+Sg+Ela: ruzūst
     ruzū+N+Pl+Nom: ruzūd
     ruzū+N+Pl+Gen: ruzūd
     ruzū+N+Pl+Par: ruzīdi
     ruzū+N+Pl+Dat: ruzūdõn
     ruzū+N+Pl+Ins: ruzūdõks
     ruzū+N+Pl+Ill: ruzīž
     ruzū+N+Pl+Ela: ruzīst
